Nebraska, session 109, LB260.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. DEFINITION OF APPROPRIATION PERIOD.
For purposes of this act and any other legislative bill passed by the One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, First or Second Session, which appropriates funds,
FY2023-24 means the period July 1, 2023, through June 30, 2024; FY2024-25 means
the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025; FY2025-26 means the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026; and FY2026-27 means the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027.
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION LANGUAGE.
There are hereby appropriated, for FY2023-24 and FY2024-25, the sums set
forth in this act to each agency for each program from the respective funds for
the general operations of state government, postsecondary education, and state
aid, except as otherwise appropriated.
Sec. 3. UNEXPENDED BALANCES AND CERTIFIED ENCUMBRANCES.
All General Fund appropriations existing on June 30, 2023, in excess of
expended and certified encumbrance amounts are hereby lapsed unless otherwise
provided. All Cash Fund and Revolving Fund appropriations existing on June 30,
2023, in excess of expended and certified encumbrance amounts are hereby lapsed
unless otherwise expressly provided. All certified encumbrance amounts on June
30, 2023, and June 30, 2024, are hereby reappropriated for FY2023-24 and
FY2024-25, respectively, which amounts shall be in addition to the amounts
shown in this act.
Sec. 4. REAPPROPRIATION OF BALANCE, FY2023-24 to FY2024-25.
In addition to the appropriations set forth in this act, there are hereby
reappropriated all unexpended appropriation balances existing on June 30, 2024,
for FY2024-25, to the respective agencies, programs, and funds listed in this
act, except as otherwise provided in this act.
Sec. 5. There are hereby reappropriated for each agency, program, and
fund for FY2023-24 and FY2024-25, any appropriation by the One Hundred Seventh
Legislature, First or Second Session, of the unexpended and unencumbered
appropriation balances of the Federal Funds allocated to the State of Nebraska
from the federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund pursuant to the federal
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, 42 U.S.C. 802, as amended, unless otherwise
indicated in this act and any other legislative bill passed by the One Hundred
Eighth Legislature, First or Second Session. Such reappropriation shall retain
any provided limitations established by the appropriating legislative bill
unless otherwise indicated within this act and any other legislative bill
passed by the One Hundred Eighth Legislature, First or Second Session.
Sec. 6. NEBRASKA ACCOUNTING SYSTEM MANUAL DEFINITIONS.
The definitions contained in the Nebraska Accounting System Manual, and
any amendments thereto, on file with the Clerk of the Legislature, are hereby
adopted by the Legislature as the definitions for this act, except as provided
in section 7 of this act.
Sec. 7. LIMITATION ON SALARIES, WAGES, AND PER DIEMS.
(1) For purposes of this act, (a) SALARY LIMIT shall mean total
expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems and (b) total
expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems shall mean all
remuneration paid to employees treated as taxable compensation by the Internal
Revenue Service or subject to social security coverage, specifically including
payments accounted for as vacation, holidays, sick leave, military leave,
funeral leave, maternity leave, administrative leave, compensatory time,
deferred compensation, or any other similar form, and amounts withheld pursuant
to law, but excluding state contributions for social security, retirement, and
employee insurance plans.
(2) Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
shall be limited to the amount shown except when federal funds in excess of the
amount shown are available and approved by the Governor. Expenditures for
permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from such grants shall be in
addition to the limitation on permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
otherwise shown in this act. No agency shall request any state funds for
continuation or replacement of any such personnel or activities in future
budget requests. To the extent feasible, requests for increases in the
limitation on permanent and temporary salaries and per diems shall be addressed
to the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature when the Legislature is in
session.
-1-

LB260 LB260
2025 2025
(3) Expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries resulting from
awards made to employees under sections 81-1346 to 81-1354 shall be in addition
to the limitations on permanent and temporary salaries and per diems otherwise
shown in this act.
(4) The limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries
and per diems for FY2024-25 as enumerated in this act shall be the basis for
continuation funding for each fiscal year of the succeeding biennium.
(5) The limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries
and per diems for FY2023-24 shall be increased by certified encumbrance amounts
from FY2022-23 for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems. The
limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for FY2024-25 shall be increased by certified encumbrance amounts from
FY2023-24 for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems. Encumbered
amounts shall be calculated in accordance with section 81-138.01.
(6) The limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries
and per diems shall only apply to remuneration paid to state employees or per
diem payments made to members of state boards or commissions.
(7) The budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services may administratively increase the limitation on
expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems upon receipt of
a request for such increase from the director of a state agency certifying the
actual amount of the payment to a former employee of such agency, or such
employee's beneficiary upon the death of the employee, of accumulated vacation
and sick leave pursuant to section 81-1325 and the rules and regulations of the
State Personnel System governing such payments.
Sec. 8. DRAWING AND PAYING WARRANTS.
The Director of Administrative Services shall draw warrants upon the
proper fund in the state treasury for an amount not to exceed the
appropriations set forth in this act upon presentation of proper documentation.
The State Treasurer shall pay the warrants out of the appropriate funds.
Sec. 9. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 123 - Clerk of the Legislature
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
CASH FUND -0- 55,000
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 55,000
Sec. 10. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 25 - Education, Administration, and Support
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND -0- 231,066
CASH FUND -0- 100,000
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 331,066
SALARY LIMIT -0- 196,457
Sec. 11. AGENCY NO. 15 — BOARD OF PARDONS AND BOARD OF PAROLE
Program No. 358 - Board of Parole
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND -0- 150,000
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 150,000
SALARY LIMIT -0- 220,120
Sec. 12. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 108 - Homestead Exemption
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND -0- 2,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 2,000,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25
$2,000,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 13. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 250 - Juvenile Services Operations
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
SALARY LIMIT -0- 500,000
Sec. 14. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 344 - Children's Health Insurance
-2-

LB260 LB260
2025 2025
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND -0- 6,000,000
CASH FUND -0- 3,000,000
FEDERAL FUND est. -0- 14,300,000
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 23,300,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25
$6,000,000 General Funds, $3,000,000 Cash Funds, and $14,300,000 Federal Funds
estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 15. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 354 - Child Welfare Aid
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND -0- 15,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 15,000,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25
$15,000,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 16. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 365 - Mental Health Operations
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND -0- 4,500,000
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 4,500,000
SALARY LIMIT -0- 6,300,000
Sec. 17. AGENCY NO. 41 — STATE REAL ESTATE COMMISSION
Program No. 77 - Enforcement of Standards - Real Estate
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
CASH FUND -0- 67,845
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 67,845
SALARY LIMIT -0- 58,925
Sec. 18. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 594 - State Insurance
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
CASH FUND -0- 100,000
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 100,000
Sec. 19. AGENCY NO. 83 — AID TO COMMUNITY COLLEGES
Program No. 152 - Community College Levy Reduction
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
CASH FUND est. -0- 6,822,827
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 6,822,827
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25
$6,822,827 Cash Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown and shall be no greater than the amount certified pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 85-1543.
Sec. 20. AGENCY NO. 85 — PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT BOARD
Program No. 41 - Administration of Retirement Systems and Deferred
Compensation
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
SALARY LIMIT -0- 41,182
Sec. 21. Section 90-562, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
90-562 AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 348 - Medical Assistance
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
-3-

LB260 LB260
2025 2025
GENERAL FUND 1,000,583,595 1,059,760,230
GENERAL FUND 1,000,583,595 1,004,665,399
CASH FUND 133,894,141 72,117,244
FEDERAL FUND est. 2,429,949,804 2,038,851,129
FEDERAL FUND est. 2,429,949,804 2,075,656,145
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,564,427,540 3,170,728,603
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,564,427,540 3,152,438,788
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classification:
No. 348 - Medical Assistance
No. 349 - Medicaid Expansion Aid
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2023-24
$1,000,583,595 General Funds, $133,894,141 Cash Funds, and $2,429,949,804
Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25
$1,059,760,230 $1,004,665,399 General Funds, $72,117,244 Cash Funds, and
$2,038,851,129 $2,075,656,145 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall
only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2023-24 $450,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for a
state plan amendment covering tobacco-use cessation in compliance with Title
XIX of the federal Social Security Act. There is included in the amount shown
as aid for this program for FY2024-25 $450,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund for a state plan amendment covering tobacco-use cessation
in compliance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. The smoking
cessation funding for FY2023-24 and FY2024-25 is for the costs of tobacco-use
cessation counseling and tobacco-use cessation pharmaceuticals approved by the
federal Food and Drug Administration for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2023-24 $-0- General Funds and $-0- Federal Funds and for FY2024-25
$2,510,597 General Funds and $4,466,385 Federal Funds for pharmacy dispensing
fees for independent pharmacies.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2023-24 $-0- General Funds and $-0- Federal Funds and for FY2024-25
$3,054,187 General Funds and $5,611,661 Federal Funds to increase reimbursement
rates for dental services provided under the Medical Assistance Act by twelve
and one-half percent for fiscal year 2024-25.
It is the intent of the Legislature that phased-down state contributions
to the federal government as defined and required by the federal Medicare
Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 may be made from
appropriations to this program.
The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services
may certify to the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services FY2023-24 and FY2024-25 unexpended
appropriation balances for Medical Assistance, Program No. 348, available to
transfer to Developmental Disability Aid, Program No. 424, to be used only to
maintain individuals with an intellectual or developmental disability in a
medicaid program that best serves their needs at a cost that does not exceed
the cost of services provided in an institution. The budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services shall
administratively transfer during FY2023-24 and FY2024-25 available
appropriations as certified by the chief executive officer of the Department of
Health and Human Services from Medical Assistance, Program No. 348, to
Developmental Disability Aid, Program No. 424.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Health and
Human Services provide monthly status reports electronically to the Clerk of
the Legislature and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst on medicaid expansion. The
department shall include in the report information on policy decisions on
services, community engagement, wellness requirements, and rate setting.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the total amount appropriated for
medicaid nursing facility rates for Program No. 348, specified as $449,351,518
for FY2023-24 ($186,851,595 General Funds and $262,499,923 Federal Funds) and
$449,351,518 for FY2024-25 ($186,031,528 General Funds and $263,319,990 Federal
Funds), shall be used in the medicaid nursing facility rate calculation for
Program No. 348, including the calculation of the annual inflation factor.
The total amount appropriated for medicaid nursing facility rates for
Program No. 348 includes amounts for rate enhancement and any other purpose
related to medicaid nursing facility services. The department shall file a
report electronically with the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Clerk of the
Legislature no later than August 1, 2023, on how the inflation factor was
calculated for FY2023-24 rates and no later than August 1, 2024, on how the
inflation factor was calculated for FY2024-25 rates.
The department shall file a report electronically with the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst and the Clerk of the Legislature between December 15 and
-4-

LB260 LB260
2025 2025
December 31 of each year of the biennium ending June 30, 2025, identifying the
amount of any unspent remaining appropriation from the prior fiscal year's
appropriations earmarked for nursing facility payments. The report shall
include an identification of encumbrances and retroactive payments.
Sec. 22. Laws 2023, LB814, section 150, is amended to read:
Sec. 150. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 549 - Parks - Administration and Operation
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND 7,600,662 2,816,945
GENERAL FUND 7,600,662 7,816,945
CASH FUND 26,263,407 31,847,402
CASH FUND 26,263,407 26,847,402
FEDERAL FUND est. 50,000 50,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 33,914,069 34,714,347
SALARY LIMIT 16,671,683 17,419,947
Sec. 23. Laws 2024, LB1087A, section 2, is amended to read:
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $617,500,000 $632,500,000 from
the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Fund, $15,000,000 from the
Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund, and $1,450,000,000 from federal funds
for FY2024-25 and (2) $632,500,000 from the Hospital Quality Assurance and
Access Assessment Fund and $1,450,000,000 from federal funds for FY2025-26 to
the Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 348, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1087, One Hundred Eighth
Legislature, Second Session, 2024.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25
$632,500,000 Cash Funds and $1,450,000,000 federal funds for state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2025-26 $632,500,000 Cash Funds and $1,450,000,000 federal
funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 24. Laws 2024, LB1329A, section 6, is amended to read:
Sec. 6. The State Treasurer shall transfer $2,000,000 $5,000,000 from the
State Department of Education Improvement Grant Fund to the Education Future
Fund on or before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 25. Laws 2024, LB1412, section 53, is amended to read:
Sec. 53. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 158 - Education Aid
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND 1,295,931,925 1,276,856,451
GENERAL FUND 1,295,931,925 1,277,505,186
CASH FUND 347,683,506 406,837,413
CASH FUND 347,683,506 327,902,759
FEDERAL FUND est. 329,782,926 331,901,676
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,973,398,357 2,015,595,540
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,973,398,357 1,937,309,621
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2023-24
$1,295,931,925 General Funds, $347,683,506 Cash Funds, and $329,782,926 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25 $1,276,856,451
$1,277,505,186 General Funds, $406,837,413 $327,902,759 Cash Funds, and
$331,901,676 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown for FY2023-24 $1,028,056,655 General
Funds which are hereby appropriated to provide state aid to public school
districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
There is included in the amount shown for FY2024-25 $1,009,486,638
$1,010,135,323 General Funds which are hereby appropriated to provide state aid
to public school districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act.
There is included in the amount shown for FY2023-24 $112,353,248 Cash
Funds which are hereby appropriated to provide twenty-four percent of
foundation aid to public school districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and
-5-

LB260 LB260
2025 2025
Educational Opportunities Support Act. There is included in the amount shown
for FY2024-25 $112,309,502 $113,145,292 Cash Funds which are hereby
appropriated to provide twenty-four percent of foundation aid to public school
districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2023-24
$505,407 General Funds for state aid for the purpose of meeting the Maintenance
of Equity requirement for federal American Rescue Plan Elementary and Secondary
School Emergency Relief Funds, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $235,724,424
General Funds and $226,580,280 Cash Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24
for special education reimbursement. There is included in the amount shown for
this program $235,724,424 General Funds and $273,565,676 $206,007,489 Cash
Funds provided as state aid for FY2024-25 for special education reimbursement.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $1,465,500 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $1,465,500 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 to carry out the provisions of subsection (2) of
section 79-734.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $10,161,395 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $10,161,395 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2024-25 for core services for educational service
units.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $3,170,927 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $3,170,927 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for technology infrastructure for educational
service units.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $281,654 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $281,654 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for distance education aid to educational service
units.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $617,898 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $617,898 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for the school breakfast program.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $392,032 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $392,032 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for the school lunch program.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $90,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $90,000 General Funds provided as
state aid for FY2024-25 for the Summer Food Service Program.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $214,664 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $214,664 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for adult basic education programs.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $750,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $750,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for aid to institutions offering high school
equivalency programs.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $3,619,357 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $3,619,357 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for early childhood education projects.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $7,500,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $7,500,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for the Early Childhood Education Grant Program for
at-risk children from birth to age three. It is the intent of the Legislature
that a maximum of five percent of General Funds appropriated each fiscal year
for the Early Childhood Education Grant Program for at-risk children from birth
to age three may be used for evaluation and technical assistance.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $100,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $100,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for scholarships for early childhood education
providers.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $69,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $69,000 General Funds provided as
state aid for FY2024-25 for incentive bonuses for providers of child care and
early childhood education programs.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $400,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $400,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for the Nurturing Healthy Behaviors program.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $470,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $470,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for learning community aid.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $2,342,962 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2023-24 and $2,342,962 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2024-25 for programs for learners with high ability.
There is included in the amount shown for this program for FY2023-24
$4,809,040 Cash Funds as state aid for career and technical education, to be
distributed between secondary and postsecondary schools according to the
formula used for federal Perkins funds as such formula existed on January 1,
2023. Each school district shall receive no less than $7,500. There is included
in the amount shown for this program for FY2024-25 $4,809,040 Cash Funds as
state aid for career and technical education, to be distributed between
secondary and postsecondary schools according to the formula used for federal
Perkins funds as such formula existed on January 1, 2023. Each school district
shall receive no less than $7,500.
There is included in the amount shown for this program for FY2023-24
-6-

LB260 LB260
2025 2025
$150,000 Cash Funds as state aid, to be evenly distributed between the career
education student organizations. There is included in the amount shown for this
program for FY2024-25 $150,000 Cash Funds as state aid, to be evenly
distributed between the career education student organizations.
Sec. 26. Laws 2024, LB1412, section 69, is amended to read:
Sec. 69. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 347 - Public Assistance
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND 66,018,454 61,018,454
GENERAL FUND 66,018,454 76,018,454
CASH FUND 4,160,000 5,360,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 162,207,325 152,207,325
PROGRAM TOTAL 232,385,779 218,585,779
PROGRAM TOTAL 232,385,779 233,585,779
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2023-24
$66,018,454 General Funds, $4,160,000 Cash Funds, and $162,207,325 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25 $61,018,454
$76,018,454 General Funds, $5,360,000 Cash Funds, and $152,207,325 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2023-24 $810,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to aid in
carrying out the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program and to provide
payment to caregivers to purchase services under the respite subsidy program.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for FY2024-25
$810,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to aid in carrying
out the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program and to provide payment to
caregivers to purchase services under the respite subsidy program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2023-24
$10,000,000 federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families funds for grants to
nonprofit organizations holding a certificate of exemption under section 501(c)
(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that distributes food in ten or more counties
in Nebraska and qualifies for the Emergency Food Assistance Program
administered by the United States Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 27. Laws 2024, LB1412, section 110, is amended to read:
Sec. 110. AGENCY NO. 85 — PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT BOARD
Program No. 515 - Public Employees Retirement
FY2023-24 FY2024-25
GENERAL FUND 60,972,169 65,329,591
GENERAL FUND 60,972,169 66,700,303
PROGRAM TOTAL 60,972,169 65,329,591
PROGRAM TOTAL 60,972,169 66,700,303
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2023-24
$45,821,148 General Funds to provide additional funding to the School Employees
Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25
$47,734,715 General Funds to provide additional funding to the School Employees
Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2023-24
$9,763,099 General Funds to provide additional funding to the Omaha School
Employees Retirement System, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25 $10,341,416
General Funds to provide additional funding to the Omaha School Employees
Retirement System, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2023-24
$4,092,005 General Funds to provide additional funding to the Nebraska State
Patrol Retirement System, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25 $7,253,460 General
Funds to provide additional funding to the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement
System, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2023-24
$1,295,917 General Funds to provide additional funding to the Nebraska Judges
Retirement System, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included
in the appropriation to this program for FY2024-25 $-0- $1,370,712 General
Funds to provide additional funding to the Nebraska Judges Retirement System,
which shall only be used for such purpose.
Pursuant to section 84-1319.01, each state agency participating in the
State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska shall contribute an
-7-

LB260 LB260
2025 2025
amount to the State Equal Retirement Benefit Fund to provide all similarly
situated male and female members with equal benefits. It is the intent of the
Legislature that the Public Employees Retirement Board notify each state agency
of the amount to be paid to the fund for FY2023-24 and FY2024-25.
Sec. 28. Original section 90-562, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska;
Laws 2023, LB814, section 150; Laws 2024, LB1087A, section 2; Laws 2024,
LB1329A, section 6; and Laws 2024, LB1412, sections 53, 69, and 110, are
repealed.
Sec. 29. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-8-